Hawaii statutes.
[§415A-7] Right of corporation to acquire
its own shares. A professional corporation may purchase its own shares
from a disqualified person without regard to the availability of capital or
surplus for such purchase; provided no purchase of or payment for its own
shares shall be made at a time when the corporation is insolvent or when such
purchase or payment would make it insolvent. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next